Washington statutes.
RCW 35.95.060

Funds derived from taxes—Restrictions on classification, etc.

No funds derived from any tax levied under the provisions of this chapter shall, for any purpose whatsoever, be classified as or constitute income, earnings, or revenue of the public transportation system for which the tax is levied nor of any other public utility owned or leased and operated by such municipality; nor shall such funds constitute or be classified as any part of the rate structure or rate charged for the public utility.

[ 1965 ex.s. c 111 s 6.]